apertium-sme-smj.smj.lexc
LEXICON AGAdj
 +A+Attr:%> K ;
 +A+SgGenCmp:%>a R ;
 +A+PlGenCmp:%>ij R ;
 +A: VUOHTA ;
 +A:%> N-ODDCASE ;
 +A:%> OTH-ODDCASE ;

LEXICON Ahkásasj
 +A+Attr:%> K ;
 +A+SgGenCmp:a%>Q1 R ;
 +A+PlGenCmp:a%>Q1j R ;
 +A+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +A:a%> GÅNÅGIS-EVEN ;
 +A: VUOHTA ;


LEXICON STÁVAL
 +A+Attr:%>Q1 K ;
 +A+SgGenCmp:%>a R ;
 +A+PlGenCmp:%>ij R ;
 +A:%>Q1 VUOHTA ;
 +A:%>Q1 N-ODDCASE ;
 +A:%> OTH-ODDCASE ;



! ======================
! Sublexica for VerbRoot
! ======================

! Even-syllable stems
! -------------------

! Modals
! - - - -

LEXICON GALGGAT
+V+IV+Ind+Prs:%> I-even-V ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt:%> II-even-V ;
+V+IV+Pot:%>Q1tj I-odd-V ;
+V+IV+Inf:%>t K ;
+V+IV+PrfPrc:%>Y3m K ;
+V+IV+Actio+Ela:mis K ;
+V+IV+Actio+Der3+Der/m:»m@C.NeedNoun@ VSBST-ODD ;
+V+IV+Ind+ConNeg:%>Q1 K ;
+V+IV+Pot+ConNeg:%>Q1tja K ;
+V+IV+Der3+Der/mus+N:»muss@C.NeedNoun@ MUS ;

LEXICON VIERTTIT
+V+IV+Ind+Prs:%> I-contr-V ;
+V+IV+Ind+Prt:%> II-contr-V ;
+V+IV+Pot:%>tj I-odd-V ;
+V+IV+Inf:%>t K ;
+V+IV+PrfPrc:%>m K ;
+V+IV+Actio+Ela:mis K ;
+V+IV+Actio+Der3+Der/m:»m@C.NeedNoun@ VSBST-ODD ;
+V+IV+Ind+ConNeg:%> K ;
+V+IV+Pot+ConNeg:%>tja K ;
+V+IV+Der3+Der/mus+N:»muss@C.NeedNoun@ MUS ;


! This is for auxiliaries, they do not have passive.
! Thus, when passive is added, it will include BASSAT, but not GALGGAT


! Ordinary main verbs
! - - - - - - - - - -


LEXICON BIEGGAT !Impersonals
+V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBIEGGAT ;
+V+IV:%> BIEGGATinfl ;
+V+IV: SG3PASSV ;
+V+IV: SG3PASSEVEN ;

LEXICON GALSSJOT !Impersonal o-verbs
+V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBIEGGAT ;
+V+IV:%> GALSSJOTinfl ;
+V+IV: SG3PASSV ;
!+V+IV: SG3PASSEVEN ; outcommented to avoid short pass.



LEXICON BIEKKASTALLAT !Allready derived Impersonals
+V+IV:%> BIEGGATinfl ;
+V+IV: SG3PASSV ;
+V+IV: SG3PASSEVEN ;

LEXICON RAVGGAT  !a- and å-verbs
+V+IV:%> RAVGGATStem ;
+V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBASSAT ;
+V+IV: SG3PASSV ;
+V+IV: SG3PASSEVEN ;


LEXICON BUOLLET  !e-verbs
+V+IV:%> RAVGGATStem ;
+V+IV: DeverbalVerbsLÁHPPET ;
+V+IV: SG3PASSV ;
+V+IV: SG3PASSEVEN ;

LEXICON VIEDJET  !e-verbs GRADE II-I WITH IE DIPHT.
+V+IV:%> VIEDJETStem ;
+V+IV: DeverbalVerbsLÁHPPET ;
+V+IV: SG3PASSV ;
+V+IV: SG3PASSEVEN ;


LEXICON MÁHTTET  !transitive verbs without personal passive
+V+TV:%> BASSATStem ;
+V+TV: DeverbalVerbsLÁHPPET ;
+V+TV: SG3PASSV ;
+V+TV: SG3PASSEVEN ;


LEXICON RAVGGALASSTET   !Like RAVGGAT for already derived words (except words ending -uššat) - no actio as first part of compounds, but reintroduced
+V+IV:%> RAVGGALASSTETStem ;
+V+IV: SG3PASSV ;
+V+IV: SG3PASSEVEN ;

LEXICON GUOTTEDALLAT   !passives on -allat - no actio as first part of compounds, but reintroduced
 +V+IV+:%> RAVGGALASSTETStem ; !replaced to avoid pass 
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/goahte+V:»goahte%> INFL-EVEN ;
! +V+IV:%> INFL-EVEN ;
! +V+IV+Der2+Actor:»@C.NeedNoun@  ACTORder ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/lis+A:»Y3liss LIS ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/mus+N:»muss@C.NeedNoun@ MUS ;

LEXICON HIEBADUVVAT   !passives on -uvvat - no actio as first part of compounds, but reintroduced
 +V+IV+:uvva%> RAVGGALASSTETStem ; !replaced to avoid pass 
 +V+IV+PrfPrc:uvvu%>m K ;
 +V+IV+PrfPrc:um%> K ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/goahte+V:uvva»goahte%> INFL-EVEN ;
! +V+IV:uvva%> INFL-EVEN ;
! +V+IV+Der2+Actor:uvva»@C.NeedNoun@  ACTORder ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/lis+A:uvva»Y3liss LIS ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/mus+N:uvva»muss@C.NeedNoun@ MUS ;

LEXICON BASSAT  !a- and å-verbs
+V+TV:%> BASSATStem ;
+V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBASSAT ;
+V+TV: EVEN-PASSIVE ;

LEXICON JUHKAT  !a-verbs with dim -istit that are hardcoded
+V+TV:%> BASSATStem ;
+V+TV: DeverbalVerbsJUHKAT ;
+V+TV: EVEN-PASSIVE ;

LEXICON LÁHPPET  !e-verbs
+V+TV:%> BASSATStem ;
+V+TV: DeverbalVerbsLÁHPPET ;
+V+TV: EVEN-PASSIVE ;

LEXICON JIEHKET  !e-verbs GRADE II-I WITH IE DIPHT.
+V+TV:%> JIEHKETStem ;
+V+TV: DeverbalVerbsLÁHPPET ;
+V+TV: EVEN-PASSIVE ;


LEXICON BASSALASSTET  !Like BASSAT for already derived words (except words ending -uššat) - no actio as first part of compounds, but reintroduced
+V+TV:%> BASSALASSTETStem ;
+V+TV: EVEN-PASSIVE ;


LEXICON DIEHTET  !Only this one word, unusual diphtong behavior
+V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTET ;
+V+TV+Ind+Prs: I-diehtet-V ;
+V+TV+Ind+Prt:%> II-sg72pl9 ;
+V+TV+Ind+Prt:e%>Q1 II-other ;
+V+TV+Pot:i%>Q1tj I-odd-V ;
 +V+TV+Imprt+Sg2:e%>Q1 # ; ! Basic Imperative, like ConNeg
+V+TV+Imprt+Du2:te%> # ;
+V+TV+Imprt:%> IMP7-EVEN ;
+V+TV+Imprt+Du1:%>on # ;
+V+TV+Imprt+Pl1:%>op # ;
+V+TV+ImprtII:%>u IMP8-EVEN ;
! Infinite
+V+TV+Inf:e%>t K ;
+V+TV+PrfPrc:á%>m K ;
!+PrsPrc:%> NOADE ; ! Noun, not correct, III grade!
+V+TV+Ger:e%>Q1dijn K ;
+V+TV+GerII:e%>min K ;
+V+TV+Sup:á%>Q1tjit K ;
+V+TV+VAbess:e%>Q1k K ;
+V+TV+VAbess:e%>Q1dak K ;
+V+TV+VAbess:e%>Q1k VUOHTA ;
+V+TV+VAbess:e%>Q1dak VUOHTA ;
+V+TV+VGen:e%>Q1 K ;
! ConNeg
+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg:e%>Q1 K ;
+V+TV+Pot+ConNeg:i%>Q1tja K ;
+V+TV+Imprt+ConNeg:e%>Q1 # ;
+V+TV+ImprtII+ConNeg+Pl2:%>u # ;
+V+TV+ImprtII+ConNeg+Sg2:%>u # ;
+V+TV+ImprtII+ConNeg+Du2:%>u # ;
+V+Actio+Ela:mis K ;
!+Actio+Der3+Der/m:e»m VSBST-ODD ;
+V+TV+Der3+Der/goahte+V:e»goahte%> INFL-EVEN ;
+V+TV:e DeverbalNounsDIEHTET ;

LEXICON BASSATStem
 BASSATINCH ;

LEXICON RAVGGATStem
 RAVGGATINCH ;


LEXICON VIEDJETStem
 VIEDJETINCH ;

LEXICON JIEHKETStem
 JIEHKETINCH ;


LEXICON BASSALASSTETStem
 BASSALASSTETINCH ;

LEXICON RAVGGALASSTETStem
 RAVGGALASSTETINCH ;


LEXICON BASSATINCH
 +Der3+Der/goahte+V:»goahte%> INFL-EVEN ;
 INFL-EVEN ;
 DeverbalNounsBASSAT ;

LEXICON RAVGGATINCH
 +Der3+Der/goahte+V:»goahte%> INFL-EVEN ;
 INFL-EVEN ;
 DeverbalNounsRAVGGAT ;

LEXICON VIEDJETINCH
 +Der3+Der/goahte+V:»goahte%> INFL-EVEN ;
 INFL-VIEDJETEVEN ;
 DeverbalNounsRAVGGAT ;

LEXICON JIEHKETINCH
 +Der3+Der/goahte+V:»goahte%> INFL-EVEN ;
 INFL-VIEDJETEVEN ;
 DeverbalNounsBASSAT ;


LEXICON BASSALASSTETINCH
 +Der3+Der/goahte+V:»goahte%> INFL-EVEN ;
 INFL-EVEN ;
 DeverbalNounsBASSALASSTET ;

LEXICON RAVGGALASSTETINCH
 +Der3+Der/goahte+V:»goahte%> INFL-EVEN ;
 INFL-EVEN ;
 DeverbalNounsRAVGGALASSTET ;


LEXICON GÁDJOT !o-verbs
+V+TV:%> GÁDJOTStem ;
+V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBASSAT ;
!+V+TV: EVEN-PASSIVE ; replaced by individual pointers to avoid short pass.
!+V+TV+Der/Pass+V:»Y9u OADDÁTINCH ; NO SHORT PASS HERE! !replaced by individual pointers to avoid pass + actio, reintroduced since it is usual!
!+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Der3+Der/goahte+V:»Y9ugoahte%> INFL-EVEN ;
!+V+TV+Der/Pass+V:»Y9u INFL-CONTRACTED ;
!+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Der2+Actor:»Y9ujiddje@C.NeedNoun@  ACTOR ;
!+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Der3+Der/mus+N:»Y9umuss@C.NeedNoun@ MUS ;
+V+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der3+Der/goahte+V:»Q1duvva»goahte%> INFL-EVEN ;
+V+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V:»Q1duvva%> INFL-EVEN ;
+V+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc:»Q1duvvu%>m K ;
+V+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der2+Actor:»Q1duvva@C.NeedNoun@  ACTOR ;
+V+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der3+Der/lis+A:»Q1duvva»Y3liss LIS ;
+V+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der3+Der/mus+N:»Q1duvva»muss@C.NeedNoun@ MUS ;
+V+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+Der2+Der/duhtte+V:»Q1duhtte%> BASSATINCH ;
+V+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der3+Der/goahte+V:»X7dalla»goahte%> INFL-EVEN ;
+V+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V:»X7dalla%> INFL-EVEN ;
+V+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der2+Actor:»X7dalla@C.NeedNoun@  ACTOR ;
+V+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der3+Der/lis+A:»X7dalla»Y3liss LIS ;
+V+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der3+Der/mus+N:»X7dalla»muss@C.NeedNoun@ MUS ;
+V+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+Der2+Der/dahtte+V:»X7dahtte%> BASSATINCH ;
+V+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc:»Q1dum%> K ;

LEXICON VerbRoot
ájádallat:ájádalla BASSALASSTET ;
álgget:álgge BUOLLET ;
ållet:ålle BUOLLET ;
arvusmahttet:arvusmahtte BASSALASSTET ;
árvustallat:árvustalla BASSALASSTET ;
ássjájduhttet:ássjájduhtte BASSALASSTET ;
ássjáskuhttet:ássjáskuhtte BASSALASSTET ;
åvddånahttet:åvddånahtte BASSALASSTET ;
bådnet:bådne LÁHPPET ;
bæggat:bægga BASSAT ;
báhtset:báhtse BUOLLET ;
bajkket:bajkke BUOLLET ;
bájttet:bájtte LÁHPPET ;
báldastahttet:báldastahtte RAVGGALASSTET ;
ballat:balla MÁHTTET ;
bárddet:bárdde LÁHPPET ;
bassat:bassa BASSAT ;
biedaldahttet:biedaldahtte BASSALASSTET ;
biedat:bieda RAVGGAT ;
bieggat:biegga BIEGGAT ;
biegget:biegge BUOLLET ;
biehket:biehke VIEDJET ;
biehttet:biehtte LÁHPPET ;
biehttot:biehtto GÁDJOT ;
bivddet:bivdde LÁHPPET ;
boarásmuvvat:boarásm HIEBADUVVAT ;
bulltjat:bulltja BASSAT ;
buodnjot:buodnjo GÁDJOT ;
buodot:buodo GÁDJOT ;
buohtastahttet:buohtastahtte BASSALASSTET ;
buollet:buolle BUOLLET ;
buorástahttet:buorástahtte BASSALASSTET ;
buvvet:buvve LÁHPPET ;
dahkat:dahka BASSAT ;
dáhpáduvvat:dáhpád HIEBADUVVAT ;
dálvvat:dálvva BIEGGAT ;
dårustahttet:dårustahtte BASSALASSTET ;
darvvat:darvva BASSAT ;
dibmat:dibma RAVGGAT ;
diehtet:dieht DIEHTET ;
dievddet:dievdde LÁHPPET ;
divvot:divvo GÁDJOT ;
doalvvot:doalvvo GÁDJOT ;
duorrat:duorra BASSAT ;
duosstat:duossta RAVGGAT ;
fuojkket:fuojkke LÁHPPET ;
gádjot:gádjo GÁDJOT ;
gærggat:gærgga BUOLLET ;
gahpet:gahpe LÁHPPET ;
gáhtat:gáhta BASSAT ;
gajkkot:gajkko GÁDJOT ;
galggat:galgga GALGGAT ;
gålggåt:gålggå RAVGGAT ;
galmmet:galmme BUOLLET ;
gássket:gásske LÁHPPET ;
gehkat:gehka MÁHTTET ;
giellat:giella BASSAT ;
giesset:giesse JIEHKET ;
gijnnat:gijnna RAVGGAT ;
goarrot:goarro GÁDJOT ;
guhkket:guhkke BUOLLET ;
guodet:guode LÁHPPET ;
guorrat:guorra BASSAT ;
hållat:hålla MÁHTTET ;
harvvet:harvve BIEGGAT ;
hávváduhttet:hávváduhtte BASSALASSTET ;
hilggot:hilggo GÁDJOT ;
iedjet:iedje VIEDJET ;
iellet:ielle JIEHKET ;
ihtet:ihte BUOLLET ;
ilmmat:ilmma RAVGGAT ;
jáhkket:jáhkke MÁHTTET ;
jåhtet:jåhte BUOLLET ;
jásstet:jásste LÁHPPET ;
jiehket:jiehke JIEHKET ;
jiermmat:jiermma RAVGGAT ;
juhkat:juhka JUHKAT ;
juojggat:juojgga BASSAT ;
læjkkot:læjkko GÁDJOT ;
lajggat:lajgga RAVGGAT ;
lájttet:lájtte LÁHPPET ;
lávggot:lávggo GÁDJOT ;
máhttet:máhtte MÁHTTET ;
masset:masse LÁHPPET ;
muohttet:muohtte BIEGGAT ;
murddet:murdde BUOLLET ;
murrat:murra RAVGGAT ;
nallat:nalla BASSAT ;
nanusmahttet:nanusmahtte BASSALASSTET ;
nihttet:nihtte LÁHPPET ;
njammat:njamma JUHKAT ;
njávgget:njávgge BUOLLET ;
njávggot:njávggo GÁDJOT ;
njuohpat:njuohpa BASSAT ;
njuolggat:njuolgga RAVGGAT ;
oadtjot:oadtjo GÁDJOT ;
oahpásmuhttet:oahpásmuhtte BASSALASSTET ;
oassálasstet:oassálasste RAVGGALASSTET ;
rahtat:rahta BASSAT ;
rássat:rássa RAVGGAT ;
rievgget:rievgge BUOLLET ;
rihppot:rihppo GÁDJOT ;
ruohkkat:ruohkka BASSAT ;
ruossat:ruossa RAVGGAT ;
sadjet:sadje LÁHPPET ;
sajájduhttet:sajájduhtte BASSALASSTET ;
savddat:savdda RAVGGAT ;
savvet:savve BUOLLET ;
sievvet:sievve JIEHKET ;
sjuvggat:sjuvgga RAVGGAT ;
skárbbat:skárbba BASSAT ;
skuollat:skuolla RAVGGAT ;
slahttet:slahtte BIEGGAT ;
snurkket:snurkke BUOLLET ;
soajttet:soajtte GALGGAT ;
soallot:soallo GÁDJOT ;
ståhkat:ståhka RAVGGAT ;
surggat:surgga BASSAT ;
suvddet:suvdde LÁHPPET ;
tjåhkot:tjåhko GÁDJOT ;
tjalggat:tjalgga RAVGGAT ;
tjarvvat:tjarvva BIEGGAT ;
tjiektjat:tjiektja BASSAT ;
tjuottjáldahttet:tjuottjáldahtte BASSALASSTET ;
tsaggat:tsagga BASSAT ;
tsahkat:tsahka RAVGGAT ;
tsáhket:tsáhke LÁHPPET ;
tsåjttset:tsåjttse BUOLLET ;
tsivkket:tsivkke BUOLLET ;
vahágahttet:vahágahtte BASSALASSTET ;
vajáldahttet:vajáldahtte BASSALASSTET ;
vájbbat:vájbba BASSAT ;
váksjot:váksjo GÁDJOT ;
vásset:vásse BUOLLET ;
viedjet:viedje VIEDJET ;
vierttit:viertti VIERTTIT ;
vissjat:vissja RAVGGAT ;
vuodjet:vuodje LÁHPPET ;
vuornnot:vuornno GÁDJOT ;
vuorrástuhttet:vuorrástuhtte BASSALASSTET ;
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
 ållessjattuk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:ållessjattug9 AGAdj ; !
 bahájuonak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:bahájuonag9 AGAdj ; !
 bahámielak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:bahámielag9 AGAdj ; !
 biellebálduk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:biellebáldug9 AGAdj ; !
 biellebáldukgielak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:biellebáldukgielag9 AGAdj ; !
 buorreluonduk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:buorreluondug9 AGAdj ; !
 buorremielak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:buorremielag9 AGAdj ; !
 buorrenálak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:buorrenálag9 AGAdj ; !
 galmmavarák+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:galmmavarág9 AGAdj ; !
 moattegielak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:moattegielag9 AGAdj ; !
 sámegielak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:sámegielag9 AGAdj ; !
 sámegielak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:sámegielag9 AGAdj ; !
 sámegielak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:sámegielag9 AGAdj ; !
 unnessjattuk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:unnessjattug9 AGAdj ; !
 unnessjattuk+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:unnessjattug9 AGAdj ; !
